Utah statutes.
10-8-11.   Streets -- Encroachments, lighting, sprinkling, cleaning.

They may regulate the use of streets, alleys, avenues, sidewalks, crosswalks, parks and public grounds, prevent and remove obstructions and encroachments thereon, and provide for the lighting, sprinkling and cleaning of the same.



No Change Since 1953

